Tennessee, session 114, HB0503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3115(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) If the state does not appropriate sufficient funds to allow an LEA or public
charter school to assign a tutor through TALLC to provide a student with tutoring
services for the entirety of the upcoming school year for purposes of subdivision
(a)(2)(A)(v) or (a)(2)(B)(iv), then the LEA or public charter is not required to provide the
pathways to promotion in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(v) or (a)(2)(B)(iv).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1503(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "Each LEA" in the subdivision and substituting "Subject to the state appropriating
sufficient funds for each LEA to participate in the learning loss remediation and student
acceleration program, each LEA" and deleting "Subject to available funding, providing" in
subdivision (C) and substituting "Providing".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0503
001734
- 1 -